Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1904
Forms.

(a) The Secretary of State may prescribe and furnish, on request, forms for: (1) An application for a certificate of existence; (2) a foreign corporation's application for a certificate of authority to transact business in this state; (3) a foreign corporation's application for a certificate of withdrawal; and (4) the biennial report. If the Secretary of State so requires, use of these forms is mandatory.

(b) The Secretary of State may prescribe and furnish, on request, forms for other documents required or permitted to be filed by the Nebraska Nonprofit Corporation Act but their use is not mandatory.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 4.